Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 2. New Institutional Health Services

Editor's notes. —

Sections

35-2-201

through 35-2-214, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 172, § 1, and Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 23, § 1, related to new institutional health services.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 218, § 2 provides:

“(a) For the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008, one million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health for the colorectal cancer screening program authorized by this act.

“(b) One hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health for breast and cervical cancer education, outreach, screening and program management.

“(c) Thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health for the outreach pilot program for medically underserved populations.

“(d) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health to implement the native sisters program.

“(e) Two hundred thirty thousand sixteen dollars ($230,016.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health for the expenses of administering the programs, including administrative and supporting costs, provided by this act and two (2) additional FTE's for the department of health are authorized. This appropriation shall not be included in the agency's 2009-2010 biennial standard budget request.”

§§ 35-2-201 through 35-2-205.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 227, § 4; 1987, ch. 225, § 1.

§ 35-2-206.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 227, §§ 1, 4; 1987, ch. 225, § 1.

§ 35-2-207.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 227, §§ 2, 4; 1987, ch. 225, § 1.

§§ 35-2-208 through 35-2-211.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 227, § 4; 1987, ch. 225, § 1.

§§ 35-2-212 through 35-2-214.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 227, § 2.